District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

29A-201.13

Annual report — Filing; fees; and penalties.

Repealed.

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1286, ch. 854, § 617
Sept. 10, 1992, D.C. Law 9-144, § 3(a), 39 DCR 4863
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(k)(1), 58 DCR 1720

History

2001 Ed., § 29-201.13.
1981 Ed., § 29-213.
1973 Ed., § 29-213.

Prior Codifications